Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.0571

Jury source list—Master jury list—Adoption of rules for implementation of methodology and standards by agencies.

The secretary of state, the department of licensing, and Washington technology solutions shall adopt administrative rules as necessary to provide for the implementation of the methodology and standards established pursuant to RCW 2.36.057 and 2.36.054 or by supreme court rule.

[ 2024 c 54 s 23; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 402; 2015 c 225 s 3; 1993 c 408 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 401-405, 409, 411, and 412: See note following RCW 2.36.057.

Severability—Effective dates—1993 c 408: See notes following RCW 2.36.054.